Wisconsin, session 2025, AB494.
do enact as follows:AB494,14Section 1. 71.07 (2dm) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,2,6571.07 (2dm) (h) The carry-over provisions of s. 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) and (f) as they 6relate to the credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b) relate to the credit under this subsection.AB494,27Section 2. 71.07 (2dx) (e) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,2,11871.07 (2dx) (e) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit 9under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection. Claimants shall 10include with their returns a copy of their certification for tax benefits and a copy of 11the department of commerce’s verification of their expenses.AB494,312Section 3. 71.07 (2dy) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,2,151371.07 (2dy) (d) 1. Except as provided in subd. 2., s. 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) and (f), as 14it applies to the credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this 15subsection.AB494,41Section 4. 71.07 (3g) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,3,3271.07 (3g) (c) Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e), (f), (g), and (h), as it applies to the 3credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under par. (a).AB494,54Section 5. 71.07 (3h) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,3,6571.07 (3h) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h) as it applies to the credit under 6s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,67Section 6. 71.07 (3n) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,3,9871.07 (3n) (f) Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e), (f), (g), and (h), as it applies to the 9credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,710Section 7. 71.07 (4k) (e) 2. b. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,3,161171.07 (4k) (e) 2. b. The amount of the claim not used to offset the tax due and 12not certified for payment under subd. 2. a. or 2. ad. may be carried forward and 13credited against Wisconsin income taxes otherwise due for the following 15 50 14taxable years to the extent not offset by these taxes otherwise due in all intervening 15years between the year in which the expense was incurred and the year in which the 16carry-forward credit is claimed.AB494,817Section 8. 71.07 (4n) (d) of the statutes is renumbered 71.07 (4n) (d) 1. and 18amended to read:AB494,3,201971.07 (4n) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (b) to (e), (g), and (h), as it applies to the 20credit under s. 71.28 (4), applies to the credits under this subsection.AB494,921Section 9. 71.07 (4n) (d) 2. of the statutes is created to read:AB494,3,232271.07 (4n) (d) 2. Section 71.28 (5b) (f), as it applies to the credit under s. 71.28 23(5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,1024Section 10. 71.07 (5b) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,4,2171.07 (5b) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit 2under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,113Section 11. 71.07 (5d) (d) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,4,5471.07 (5d) (d) 2. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit 5under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,126Section 12. 71.07 (5g) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,4,8771.07 (5g) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit 8under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,139Section 13. 71.07 (5i) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,4,111071.07 (5i) (d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to 11the credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,1412Section 14. 71.07 (5j) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,4,141371.07 (5j) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit under 14s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,1515Section 15. 71.07 (5k) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,4,171671.07 (5k) (d) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to 17the credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,1618Section 16. 71.07 (5n) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,4,201971.07 (5n) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit 20under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,1721Section 17. 71.07 (5r) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,4,232271.07 (5r) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit 23under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,1824Section 18. 71.07 (5rm) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,5,2171.07 (5rm) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit 2under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,193Section 19. 71.07 (6n) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,5,5471.07 (6n) (d) 1. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to the credit 5under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,206Section 20. 71.07 (8b) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,5,8771.07 (8b) (e) Administration. Section 71.28 (4) (5b) (e) to (h), as it applies to 8the credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), applies to the credit under this subsection.AB494,219Section 21. 71.07 (9m) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,5,111071.07 (9m) (e) The provisions of s. 71.28 (4) (5b) (e), (f), (g) and (h), as they 11apply to the credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), apply to the credit under this subsection.AB494,2212Section 22. 71.07 (9r) (g) of the statutes is amended to read:AB494,5,141371.07 (9r) (g) The provisions of s. 71.28 (4) (5b) (f), (g) and (h), as they apply to 14the credit under s. 71.28 (4) (5b), apply to the credit under this subsection.AB494,2315Section 23. 71.07 (10) (d) of the statutes is amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab494 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab494 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB494 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB494 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB494: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting